Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Chapter 16. Leases.

§ 55.1-1600.
Form of a lease.

A lease may be made in a form substantially similar to the following: “This lease, made the
_______________
day of
_______________ , in the year
_______________ , between (herein insert the names of parties), witnesseth: that the said
_______________
does (or do) demise unto the said
_______________ , his personal representative and assigns, all (here describe the property) from the
_______________
day of
_______________ , for the term of
_______________ , thence ensuing, yielding therefor during the said term the rent of (here state the rent and mode of payment). Witness the following signature (or signatures).”

History.

Code 1919, § 5165; Code 1950, § 55-57; 2019, cc. 11, 49, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 11 and 49 amended § 55-57 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “A lease may” for “A deed of lease may,” “ ‘This lease” for “ ‘This deed,” “does” for “doth” and “signature (or signatures)” for “signature and seal (or signatures and seals).”

Amendments by Acts 2019,
cc. 11 and 49, were in response to
Game Place, L.L.C. v. Fredericksburg 35, LLC
,

295 Va. 396

, 813 S.E.2d 312 (2018). See the case notes below.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Deeds of” was deleted from the Chapter heading to correct an error in the 2019 act.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1601.
Memoranda of leases and options.

In lieu of the recording of a lease, a memorandum of such lease may be recorded, executed by the lessor and the lessee in the manner that would entitle a conveyance to be recorded. Such memorandum of lease shall contain at least the following information with respect to the lease:

The name of the lessor;

The name of the lessee and a reference to the lease;

The addresses, if any, set forth in the lease as addresses of such parties;

The date of the memorandum of such lease;

A description of the leased premises; and

A statement of the term, commencement date or termination date, and rights of extension or renewal, if any, to the extent required to determine the period for which or date to which the lease may be in effect.

In lieu of the recording of an option to purchase real estate, a memorandum of such option may be recorded, executed by the grantor of the option in the manner that would entitle a conveyance to be recorded. Such memorandum of option to purchase real estate shall contain at least the following information with respect to the option:

The name of the person granting the option;

The name of the optionee and a reference to the option;

The addresses, if any, set forth in the agreement as addresses of such parties;

The date of the memorandum of the option;

A description of the optioned premises;

The option price or reference to the document containing the method with regard to how the option price is computed; and

The statement of the term, commencement date or termination date, and rights of extension or renewal, if any, to the extent required to determine the period during which or date to which the option may be in effect.

History.

1978, c. 628, § 55-57.1; 1982, c. 365; 1984, c. 573; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1602.
Certain covenants of lessee “to pay the rent” and “to pay the taxes.”

In a lease, (i) a covenant by the lessee “to pay the rent” shall have the effect of a covenant that the rent reserved by the lease shall be paid to the lessor, or those entitled under the lessor, in the manner stated in the lease, and (ii) a covenant by the lessee “to pay the taxes” shall have the effect of a covenant that all the taxes, levies, and assessments upon the demised premises, or upon the lessor on account thereof, shall be paid by the lessee or those claiming under the lessee.

History.

Code 1919, § 5178; Code 1950, § 55-76; 2019, cc. 11, 49, 712; 2020, c. 592.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 11 and 49 amended § 55-76 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “In a lease” for “In a deed of lease” and “lease shall” for “deed shall.”

Amendments by Acts 2019, cc. 11 and 49, were in response to
Game Place, L.L.C. v. Fredericksburg 35, LLC
,

295 Va. 396

, 813 S.E.2d 312 (2018). See the case note below.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 592 substituted “in the lease” for “in the deed” in clause (i).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Covenants, § 38.

§ 55.1-1603.
Certain covenants of lessee that “he will not assign without leave” and that “he will leave the premises in good repair.”

In a lease, (i) a covenant by the lessee that “he will not assign without leave” shall have the same effect as a covenant that the lessee will not, during the term, assign, transfer, or set over the premises, or any part of such premises, to any person without the consent, in writing, of the lessor or the lessor’s representative or assigns, and (ii) a covenant by the lessee that “he will leave the premises in good repair” shall, subject to the qualifications of §

55.1-1411

, have the same effect as a covenant that the demised premises will, at the expiration or other sooner determination of the term, be peaceably surrendered and yielded to the lessor or the lessor’s representatives or assigns in good and substantial repair and condition, reasonable wear and tear excepted.

History.

Code 1919, § 5179; Code 1950, § 55-77; 2019, cc. 11, 49, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 11 and 49 amended § 55-77 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “In a lease” for “In a deed of lease.”

Amendments by Acts 2019, cc. 11 and 49, were in response to
Game Place, L.L.C. v. Fredericksburg 35, LLC
,

295 Va. 396

, 813 S.E.2d 312 (2018). See the case note below.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

11B M.J. Landlord and Tenant, § 35.

§ 55.1-1604.
Covenant of lessor “for lessee’s quiet enjoyment.”

A covenant by a lessor “for the lessee’s quiet enjoyment of his term” shall have the same effect as a covenant that the lessee, or the lessee’s personal representative or lawful assigns, paying the rent reserved and performing his covenants, shall peaceably possess and enjoy the demised premises, for the term granted, without any interruption or disturbance from any person.

History.

Code 1919, § 5181; Code 1950, § 55-78; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1605.
Effect of provision for reentry by lessor.

If a lease provides that “the lessor may reenter for default of
_______________
days in the payment of rent, or for the breach of covenants,” it has the effect of an agreement that if the rent reserved, or any part of such rent, is unpaid for such number of days after the day on which it was due, or if any of the other covenants on the part of the lessee or his personal representative or assigns is broken, then, in either of such cases, the lessor, or those entitled in the lessor’s place, at any time afterwards may reenter into and upon the demised premises, or any part of such premises, in the name of the whole, and the same again have, repossess, and enjoy, as of his former estate.

History.

Code 1919, § 5182; Code 1950, § 55-79; 2019, cc. 11, 49, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 11 and 49 amended § 55-79 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Act 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “If a lease” for “If a deed of lease.”

Amendments by Acts 2019, cc. 11 and 49, were in response to
Game Place, L.L.C. v. Fredericksburg 35, LLC
,

295 Va. 396

, 813 S.E.2d 312 (2018). See the case note below.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Covenants, §§ 3.